Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.090

Candidate. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination or election when the individual first:

(1) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space or facilities with intent to promote the individual's candidacy for office;

(2) Announces publicly or files for office;

(3) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to promote the individual's candidacy; or

(4) Gives consent to another person to take on behalf of the individual any of the actions in subsection (1) or (3) of this section.

[ 2024 c 164 s 209.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.